src-fst-morphology-stems-fit-abbreviations.lexc.md
# File containing meänkieli abbreviations 

This file documents [the file for Meänkieli abbreviations](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/stems/fit-abbreviations.lexc).

The file contains 5-6 abbreviations, and is thus just a placeholder.
Most fit abbreviations thus come from the common abbreviation file. 
Here we should add meänkieli-specific ones.

## Lexica for adding tags and periods

1. ITRAB ; 
1. TRNUMAB ; 
1. TRAB ; 

## The abbreviation lexicon itself

###           Intransitive abbreviations           

* LEXICON ITRAB 

* e.Kr+Adv:e.Kr ab-dot-adv-itrab ; 

###     Abreviations who are transitive in front of numerals    

* LEXICON TRNUMAB 

* nro+N:nro ab-noun-trnumab ; 

###             Transitive abbreviations           

* LEXICON TRAB 

* esim+A:esim ab-dot-adj-trab ; 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/fit-abbreviations.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/fit-abbreviations.lexc)</small>

---
